Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1094
Other insurance laws, how construed.

Societies shall be governed by sections 44-1072 to 44-10,109 and shall be exempt from all other provisions of the insurance laws of this state unless they are expressly designated therein or unless such provisions are specifically made applicable by sections 44-1072 to 44-10,109.

Laws 1985, LB 508, § 23.